Windows-l10n-central/da/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/da.dic
a/402
ABC/401
abc/401,466
advokatpraksis/70,267,976
af/466
afgrænselig/913,70,366,976
afhop/70,267,976
airbrush/70,73,7,976,466
akantus/70,267,976
albuminøs/913,70,366,976
alias/70,267,976
alvorsfuld/70,962,366
amager/20,7,70,976,466
angrebsmæssig/207,70,366,976
anis/70,267,976
ANSI/466
appellativ/913,70,366,976
arbejdssejr/402
arvelig/207,70,366,976
ATP/466
atp/466
audit/70,267,976
au pair/466
B/402
b/402
BA/466
bakteriefri/70,962,366
Basic/190,976,466
basilikum/70,267,976
behagesyg/913,70,366,976
benbræk/70,267,976
benved/70,267,976
bestikke/976,466
betalbar/70,962,366
betalings-tv/402
betonslum/70,267,976
bh/401
bilateral/70,962,366
bit/70,267,976,941,947
blegfed/70,962,366
blåbær/70,267,976
blårød/70,962,366
blåstak/70,267,976
BMI/466
bolle-å/402
Bosnien/55,466
brandrød/70,962,366
brombær/70,267,976
brøsig/207,70,366,976
buksbom/70,267,976,941,947
børne-tv/402
C/402
c/402
cd/401,466
CDROM/401
cellulær/70,962,366
cha-cha-cha/70,73,7,976,466
chat/70,267,976
chip/70,267,976
Christiansborg/55,466
cis/70,9,976,466
CMS/466
CMYK/466
computervirus/70,267,976
cpr/466
cpu/466
CRM/466
csv/466
CTRL/466
cvr/466
cyclamen/70,267,976
cyklamen/70,267,976
D/402
d/402
datamaskinel/841,70,366
debatindlæg/70,267,976
Debian/55,466
delvis/70,962,366
diabetes/193,70,976,466
dias/70,267,976,941,947
DictOOo/55,466
digitalis/70,267,976,940,947
dip/70,267,976
diploid/70,962,366
djævelsbid/70,267,976
dna/466
docx/466
Draw/55,466
driftsklar/70,962,366
drive-in/190,976,466
dropdown/70,976,466
DSB/466
dtp/466
Duma/55,466
duntæt/841,70,366
DVD/401,466
dvd/401,466
dødsenskedsommelig/207,70,366,976
e/402
EFG/466
efg/466
efterviselig/913,70,366,976
EGU/466
egu/466
eksponentiel/1106,70,366
el/466
email/70,976,466
endimensionel/841,70,366
enebær/70,267,976
en gros/466
ep/401
Epidural/55,466
erhvervsmæssig/207,70,366,976
ESDH/466
etbær/70,267,976
eukalyptus/70,267,976,941,947
Excel/55,466
exe/466
f/402
fabriksmæssig/207,70,366,976
fadøl/70,267,976
FAQ/466
fartgal/70,962,366
farve-tv/402
fejr/207,70,366,976
finkulturel/1106,70,366
Firefox/55,466
fiskesennep/70,267,976
flash/70,976,466
fleksjob/70,267,976,941,947
florlet/841,70,366
flyverøn/70,267,976
FN/466
forargelig/207,70,366,976
foregive/466
forhåbningsfuld/70,962,366
fornøjelig/207,70,366,976
fortrydelig/207,70,366,976
fredelig/207,70,366,976
frisbee/401
frodig/207,70,366,976
fruebær/70,267,976
frøbid/70,267,976
fuldesyg/913,70,366,976
fællesrum/70,267,976
fængbar/70,962,366
G/402
g/402
galdebær/70,267,976
galmyg/70,267,976
galnebær/70,267,976
garderhøj/70,962,366
gedeskæg/70,267,976
gennemsund/70,962,366
Gentoo/55,466
gestus/70,267,976
GIF/466
gigaton/70,267,976
gladiolus/70,267,976
glat/1106,70,366,941,947
GPS/401,466
gravid/70,962,366
grådlabil/913,70,366,976
gråskæg/70,267,976
gul/70,962,366,466
guldknap/70,267,976
gymnasial/70,962,366
h/402
halvkold/70,962,366
Hans/55,466
haploid/70,962,366
hdtv/402
hellig/207,70,366,976,466
herlig/207,70,366,976
hh/466
hhx/466
hibiscus/70,267,976
hjemme-PC/70,73,7,976,466
hjemme-pc/70,73,7,976,466
hoffæhig/913,70,366,976
hotspot/70,267,976
HTML/466
https/466
htx/466
huleagtig/207,70,366,976
hvidtøl/70,267,976
hvirvelløs/70,962,366
hyperlink/70,976,466
høgeskæg/70,267,976
højgravid/70,962,366
høslæt/70,267,976
håndterlig/207,70,366,976
I/402
i/402
IB/466
id/190,976,466
illegitim/70,962,366
Impress/55,466
indfri/70,962,366
initiativløs/70,962,366
international/70,962,366
ISBN/466
islæt/70,267,976
ISO/466
IT/466
it/466
j/402
jadegrøn/1106,70,366
jetlag/70,267,976
jordbær/70,267,976,941,947
JPG/466
julebryg/70,267,976
julekaktus/70,267,976
jævngod/913,70,366,976
jødekirsebær/70,267,976
jødeskæg/70,267,976
K/402
k/402
kabel-tv/402
karg/913,70,366,976
KDE/55,466
kilobit/70,267,976
kiloton/70,267,976
kipbar/913,70,366,976
kirsebær/70,267,976,941,947
klematis/70,267,976,941,947
kløgtig/207,70,366,976
kokos/70,267,976,941,947
koldblodig/207,70,366,976
koneagtig/207,70,366,976
konstruktiv/70,962,366
kornelbær/70,267,976
kornfed/70,962,366
korsfæste/6,143,148,466
korsknap/70,267,976
korsved/70,267,976
kritiserbar/913,70,366,976
krysantemum/70,267,976
krægebær/70,267,976
krækkebær/70,267,976
kumquat/70,267,976
kundskabsrig/70,962,366
kvalkved/70,267,976
Kyoto/55,466
kæk/1106,70,366
l/402
labial/913,70,366,976
lapsus/70,267,976
lasciv/70,962,366
lathyrus/70,267,976
lerholdig/207,70,366,976
ligelig/207,70,366,976
Linux/55,466
livstræt/841,70,366
lokal-tv/402
lotus/70,267,976,941,947
lp/401
lummerhed/70,962,366
lysegrøn/1106,70,366
løjerlig/207,70,366,976
M/402
m/402
Macintosh/55,466
maksimal/70,962,366
malariamyg/70,267,976
marionetagtig/207,70,366,976
medskyldig/207,70,366,976
megabit/70,267,976
melbær/70,267,976,941,947
mereværdig/913,70,366,976
Meta/55,466
Microsystems/55,466
mikrochip/70,267,976
milliardstor/70,962,366
mini-tv/402
modløs/70,962,366
morgenkold/70,962,366
mosekonebryg/70,267,976
mountainbike/70,976,466
muldvarpeskud/70,267,976
multebær/70,267,976
musikvidenskabelig/913,70,366,976
myg/70,267,976,449,947
München/55,466
mørkegul/70,962,366
N/402
n/402
naturfaglig/207,70,366,976
Nautilus/55,466
Netscape/55,466
nikkelfri/70,962,366
novemberkaktus/70,267,976
nylig/207,70,366,976
nøgtern/70,962,366
O/402
o/402
ODF/466
ombyttelig/207,70,366,976
OpenBasic/55,466
OpenOffice/55,466
operationsklar/70,962,366
ordknap/1106,70,366
organisatorisk/917,976,466
overkorrekt/913,70,366,976
P/402
p/402
papegøjenæb/70,267,976
papirstynd/70,962,366
pappadam/70,267,976
passus/70,267,976
pc/401,947
PC/466
PDF/466
perceptuel/841,70,366
perubalsam/70,267,976
PHP/466
pigesur/913,70,366,976
pit/70,267,976
platinblond/70,962,366
positiv/70,962,366
PowerPoint/70,7,252,976,466
pr/190,976,466
praksis/70,267,976,941,947
proceduremæssig/207,70,366,976
provestlig/207,70,366,976
pubertær/913,70,366,976
pungbrok/70,267,976
python/70,73,7,976,466
påskebryg/70,267,976
påviselig/207,70,366,976
q/402
r/402
rag/70,267,976
rawlplug/70,267,976
regional-tv/402
registerton/70,267,976
regnskabsmæssig/913,70,366,976
reklame-TV/402
RGB/466
rhesusnegativ/70,962,366
roadtrip/70,267,976
rtf/466
rødnæb/70,267,976
rådig/913,70,366,976
S/402
s/402
sartgrøn/1106,70,366
satellit-tv/402
SFO/70,976,466
SHIFT/190,976,466
sigtbar/70,962,366
sildemakrel/70,267,976
simulator/70,73,7,976,466
singrøn/70,267,976
skolefri/913,70,366,976
skole-tv/402
slagkraftig/207,70,366,976
slum/70,267,976,941,947
slæt/70,267,976
smånervøs/70,962,366
snabel-a/402
snebær/70,267,976
soldug/70,267,976
SOS/402
speciallægepraksis/70,267,976
specifik/1106,70,366
spot/70,267,976
stand-up/70,976,466
StarDraw/190,976,466
statsansat/841,70,366
stenbræk/70,267,976
stikkelsbær/70,267,976,941,947
stikmyg/70,267,976
stjerneanis/70,267,976
storkenæb/70,267,976
stridbar/70,962,366
strip/70,267,976
SU/193,70,976,466
sukkerholdig/207,70,366,976
synbar/70,962,366
T/402
t/402
takstmæssig/207,70,366,976
tangspræl/70,267,976
tapas/70,267,976
tee/401,941,947
tekst-tv/402
tilladelig/207,70,366,976
traditionsløs/70,962,366
træfri/70,962,366
tv/402
txt/466
tys-tys/190,976,466
tyttebær/70,267,976
tænkbar/70,962,366
U/402
u/402
ubesvarlig/913,70,366,976
uerholdelig/207,70,366,976
ug/402
uheldig/207,70,366,976
ultratynd/70,962,366
universitær/70,962,366
UNIX/55,466
uppercut/70,267,976
urund/913,70,366,976
utilrådelig/207,70,366,976
V/402
v/402
vagtsom/1025,366,976
valium/70,267,976
velvillig/207,70,366,976
ventrikel/70,976,466
verdens-/942,946,466
versere/6,143,148,466
versionere/6,143,148,466
vesper/193,70,976,466
vestdansk/976,466
vestende/70,73,7,976,466
vesterlandsk/976,466
vesteuropæisk/917,976,466
vestgoter/20,7,70,976,466
vestindisk/917,976,466
vestover/466
vestre/976,466
vestside/70,73,7,976,466
veterinærmedicinsk/976,466
V-formet/70,1062,466
vidløs/70,962,366,466
vidskræmt/976,466
vintergrøn/70,267,976
vinøs/70,962,366
VIP/70,976,466
vm/466
væsensforskellig/207,70,366,976
w/402
walkie-talkie/70,73,7,976,466
wc/402
Windows/55,466
Word/190,976,466
Writer/190,976,466
X/402
x/402
XML/466
y/402
yankee/401
yen/70,267,976
Ystad/55,466
yuan/70,267,976
z/402
æ/402
ø/402
å/402
åleglat/841,70,366
